Utah statutes.
77-36-7.   Prosecutor to notify victim of decision as to prosecution.
(1)  The prosecutor who is responsible for making the decision of whether to
prosecute a case shall advise the victim, if the victim has requested
notification, of the status of the victim's case and shall notify the victim
of a decision within five days after the decision has been made.
(2)  Notification to the victim that charges will not be filed against an
alleged perpetrator shall include a description of the procedures available to
the victim in that jurisdiction for initiation of criminal and other
protective proceedings.
